Hawaii statutes.
§455-4 State board of naturopathic
medicine. The governor shall appoint the board of naturopathic medicine,
consisting of five members. Each member shall serve until the member's
successor is appointed and qualified. Three members of the board, before
appointment, shall have been licensed as a naturopathic physician in the State
and two shall be public members. The members of the board may elect a
chairperson and a vice-chairperson who shall each serve one year or until a
successor is elected. [L 1937, c 221, §3; RL 1945, §2654; RL 1955, §66-4; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §5; HRS §455-4; am L 1978, c 208, §6; gen ch 1985; am L 1986,
c 76, §8; am L 1992, c 9, §1 and c 202, §103; am L Sp 2009, c 22, §6]

Cross References

Departmental administration, see §§26-9 and 26-35.

Attorney General Opinions

This statute is constitutional, with regard to the use of the
phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next